Hawaii statutes.
§225M-1 Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to establish an office of planning to assist the governor and the
director of business, economic development, and tourism in maintaining an
overall framework to guide the development of the State through a continuous
process of comprehensive, long-range, and strategic planning to meet the
physical, economic, and social needs of Hawaii's people, and provide for the
wise use of Hawaii's resources in a coordinated, efficient, and economical
manner, including the conservation of those natural, environmental,
recreational, scenic, historic, and other limited and irreplaceable resources
which are required for future generations.

The establishment of an office of planning in
the department of business, economic development, and tourism, for
administrative purposes, is intended to:

(1) Fix responsibility and accountability to
successfully carry out statewide planning programs, policies, and priorities;

(2) Improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the
operations of the executive branch;

(3) Ensure comprehensive planning and coordination to
enhance the quality of life of the people of Hawaii. [L 1987, c 336, pt of §1;
am L 1996, c 299, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next